Washington statutes.
RCW 11.98.055

Judicial transfer of situs of trusts.

(1) Any trustee, beneficiary, or beneficiary representative may petition the superior court of the county of the situs of the trust for a transfer of the situs of a trust in accordance with RCW 11.96A.080 through 11.96A.200.

(2) At the conclusion of the hearing, if the court finds the requirements of RCW 11.98.045(2) have been satisfied, it may direct the transfer of the situs of a trust on such terms and conditions as it deems appropriate. The court in its discretion may provide for payment from the trust of reasonable fees and expenses for any party to the proceeding. Delivery of trust assets in accordance with the court's order is a full discharge of the trustee's duties in relation to all transferred property.

(3) A change of trust situs does not authorize a change of trustee. Change of trustee of a trust requires compliance with RCW 11.98.039.

[ 2011 c 327 s 25; 1999 c 42 s 620; 1985 c 30 s 47. Prior: 1984 c 149 s 76.]

NOTES:

Application—Effective date—2011 c 327: See notes following RCW 11.103.020.

Effective date—1999 c 42: See RCW 11.96A.902.

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.

Severability—Effective dates—1984 c 149: See notes following RCW 11.02.005.